Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Division of Environmental Services

249.400.
Definitions for KRS 249.400 to 249.430.

As used in KRS

249.400

to

249.430

unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture;

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Division” means the Division of Environmental Services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 62, § 1, effective June 16, 1960; 2002, ch. 49, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 88, § 4, effective July 13, 2004.

249.410.
Division of Environmental Services — Supervision.

The Division of Environmental Services in the Department of Agriculture shall be under the supervision of the Commissioner and shall consist of personnel determined and appointed by him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 62, § 3; 2002, ch. 49, § 5, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 88, § 5, effective July 13, 2004.

249.420.
Duties.

In addition to its other duties, the division shall promote and sponsor programs to control pests and noxious weeds, shall enforce related regulatory and service measures assigned to the department, and may conduct a pest and noxious weed control program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 62, § 4, effective June 16, 1960; 2004, ch. 88, § 6, effective July 13, 2004; 2022 ch. 131, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

249.430.
Authority of division.

In order to perform the duties listed in KRS

249.420

, the division may:

Issue and enforce regulations for the control of noxious weeds and pests;

Cooperate with county agricultural agents, vocational agricultural teachers, University of Kentucky extension specialists, civic groups, or any federal, state or county agency in promoting county programs and organizations to control noxious weeds and pests;

Cooperate with federal or state agencies in research and educational work in the field of pest and noxious weed control;

Assist counties in qualifying for cost-sharing programs to control noxious weeds;

Publicize the threat of noxious weeds and pests and methods of combating them;

Cooperate with the Department of Highways, county fiscal courts, transportation and industrial organizations in controlling noxious weeds on their premises and rights-of-way; and

Accept funds or contributions to carry out the purposes of KRS

249.400

to

249.430

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 62, § 5, effective June 16, 1960; 2022 ch. 131, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Johnson grass eradication on rights-of-way, KRS

176.051

.

249.510.
Mosquito control districts — Creation — Purpose — Boundaries. [Repealed.]

249.520.
Mosquito control committee — Members — Compensation. [Repealed.]

249.530.
Aid for mosquito control. [Repealed.]

249.540.
Petition to establish county mosquito control district. [Repealed.]

249.550.
Notice of filing petition — Referendum. [Repealed.]

249.551.
Tax levy on filing of petition — Form of petition. [Repealed.]

249.560.
District board of supervisors — Appointment — Terms. [Repealed.]

249.570.
Officers of board — Election — Oath — Bond. [Repealed.]

249.580.
Powers and duties of board. [Repealed.]

249.590.
Fiscal year of district. [Repealed.]

249.600.
Submission by board of plan of procedure and operation to fiscal court. [Repealed.]

249.610.
District tax levy — Collection — Disbursement [Repealed].

249.620.
Joint operation of districts [Repealed.]

249.630.
Dissolution of district. [Repealed.]

249.631.
Dissolution of district — Petition — Procedure. [Repealed.]